Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1704.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 APPROPRIATIONS Section 1. new text begin AGRICULTURE APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are appropriated to the agencies and for the purposes specified in this article. The appropriations are from the general fund, or another named fund, and are available for the fiscal years indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the appropriations listed under them are available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. "The first year" is fiscal year 2026. "The second year" is fiscal year 2027. "The biennium" is fiscal years 2026 and 2027. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTUREnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 62,388,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 59,032,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 61,989,000 new text end new text begin 58,633,000 new text end new text begin Remediation new text end new text begin 399,000 new text end new text begin 399,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Protection Services new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 22,333,000 new text end new text begin 22,836,000 new text end new text begin Remediation new text end new text begin 399,000 new text end new text begin 399,000 new text end new text begin (a) $399,000 the first year and $399,000 the second year are from the remediation fund for administrative funding for the voluntary cleanup program. new text end new text begin (b) $639,000 the first year and $639,000 the second year are for the soil health financial assistance program under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.134. The commissioner may award no more than $50,000 of the appropriation each year to a single recipient. The commissioner may use up to 6.5 percent of this appropriation for costs incurred to administer the program. Any unencumbered balance does not cancel at the end of the first year and is available in the second year. Appropriations encumbered under contract on or before June 30, 2027, for soil health financial assistance grants are available until June 30, 2029. new text end new text begin (c) $350,000 the first year and $350,000 the second year are for compensation for destroyed or crippled livestock under Minnesota Statutes, section 3.737. The first year appropriation may be spent to compensate for livestock that were destroyed or crippled during fiscal year 2025. If the amount in the first year is insufficient, the amount in the second year is available in the first year. The commissioner may use up to $5,000 each year to reimburse expenses incurred by university extension educators to provide fair market values of destroyed or crippled livestock. If the commissioner receives federal money to pay claims for destroyed or crippled livestock, an equivalent amount of this appropriation may be used to reimburse nonlethal prevention methods performed by federal wildlife services staff. new text end new text begin (d) $310,000 the first year and $310,000 the second year are for compensation for crop damage under Minnesota Statutes, section 3.7371. If the amount in the first year is insufficient, the amount in the second year is available in the first year. The commissioner may use up to $10,000 of the appropriation each year to reimburse expenses incurred by the commissioner or the commissioner's approved agent to investigate and resolve claims, as well as for costs associated with training for approved agents. The commissioner may use up to $40,000 of the appropriation each year for grants to producers for measures to protect stored crops from elk damage. If the commissioner determines that claims made under Minnesota Statutes, section 3.737 or 3.7371, are unusually high, amounts appropriated for either program may be transferred to the appropriation for the other program. new text end new text begin (e) $825,000 the first year and $825,000 the second year are to replace capital equipment in the Department of Agriculture's analytical laboratory. new text end new text begin (f) $75,000 the first year and $75,000 the second year are to support a meat processing liaison position to assist new or existing meat and poultry processing operations in getting started, expanding, growing, or transitioning into new business models. new text end new text begin (g) $420,000 the first year and $923,000 the second year are for additional funding to maintain the current level of service delivery for programs under this subdivision. new text end new text begin (h) $1,000,000 the first year and $1,000,000 the second year are for grants to counties to support county agricultural inspectors under section 13. These are onetime appropriations. The commissioner of agriculture may use up to three percent of the appropriation each year for administration. new text end new text begin (i) $850,000 the first year and $850,000 the second year are for additional meat and poultry inspection services. The commissioner is encouraged to seek inspection waivers, matching federal money, and offer more online inspections for the purposes of this paragraph. new text end new text begin (j) $1,250,000 the first year and $1,250,000 the second year are appropriated to establish and administer the biofertilizer innovation and efficiency program. The commissioner may use up to 6.5 percent of this appropriation for costs incurred to administer the program. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, any unencumbered balance at the end of fiscal year 2026 does not cancel and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Agricultural Marketing and Development new text end new text begin 24,676,000 new text end new text begin 24,676,000 new text end new text begin (a) $150,000 the first year and $150,000 the second year are to expand international trade opportunities and markets for Minnesota agricultural products. new text end new text begin (b) $634,000 the first year and $634,000 the second year are for the continuation of the dairy development and profitability enhancement programs, including dairy profitability teams and dairy business planning grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 32D.30. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner may use money appropriated in this subdivision for annual cost-share payments to resident farmers or entities that sell, process, or package agricultural products in Minnesota for the costs of organic certification. The commissioner may allocate these funds for assistance to persons transitioning from conventional to organic agriculture. new text end new text begin (d) $100,000 the first year and $100,000 the second year are for mental health outreach and support to farmers, ranchers, farm workers and employees, and others in the agricultural profession and for farm and farm worker safety grant and outreach programs under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.1195. Mental health outreach and support may include a 24-hour hotline, stigma reduction, and education. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, any unencumbered balance does not cancel at the end of the first year and is available in the second year. These are onetime appropriations. new text end new text begin (e) $20,082,000 the first year and $20,082,000 the second year are for the agricultural growth, research, and innovation program under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.12. Except as provided in paragraph (f), the commissioner may allocate this appropriation each year among the following areas: (1) facilitating the start-up, modernization, improvement, or expansion of livestock operations, including beginning and transitioning livestock operations with preference given to robotic dairy-milking equipment; (2) assisting value-added agricultural businesses to begin or expand, to access new markets, or to diversify, including aquaponics systems, with preference given to hemp fiber processing equipment; (3) facilitating the start-up, modernization, or expansion of other beginning and transitioning farms, including by providing loans under Minnesota Statutes, section 41B.056; (4) sustainable agriculture on-farm research and demonstration; (5) the development or expansion of food hubs and other alternative community-based food distribution systems; (6) enhancing renewable energy infrastructure and use; (7) crop research, including basic and applied turf seed research; (8) Farm Business Management tuition assistance; (9) supporting the commercialization of an innovative material additive utilizing agricultural coproducts or waste streams to produce fiber-based barrier packaging to reduce perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroakyl substances (PFAS) and plastics in packaging products; and (10) Good Agricultural Practices and Good Handling Practices certification assistance. The commissioner may use up to 6.5 percent of this appropriation for costs incurred to administer the program. new text end new text begin (f) Of the amount appropriated for the agricultural growth, research, and innovation program in paragraph (e): new text end new text begin (1) $1,000,000 the first year and $1,000,000 the second year are for distribution in equal amounts to each of the state's county fairs to preserve and promote Minnesota agriculture; new text end new text begin (2) $3,000,000 the first year and $3,000,000 the second year are for incentive payments under Minnesota Statutes, sections 41A.16, 41A.17, 41A.18, and 41A.20. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, the first year appropriation is available until June 30, 2027, and the second year appropriation is available until June 30, 2028. If this appropriation exceeds the total amount for which all producers are eligible in a fiscal year, the balance of the appropriation is available for other purposes under this paragraph or paragraph (e); new text end new text begin (3) $4,500,000 the first year and $4,500,000 the second year are for grants that enable retail petroleum dispensers, fuel storage tanks, and other equipment to dispense biofuels to the public in accordance with the biofuel replacement goals established under Minnesota Statutes, section 239.7911. A retail petroleum dispenser selling petroleum for use in spark ignition engines for vehicle model years after 2000 is eligible for grant money under this clause if the retail petroleum dispenser has no more than 20 retail petroleum dispensing sites and each site is located in Minnesota. The grant money must be used to replace or upgrade equipment that does not have the ability to be certified for E25. A grant award must not exceed $200,000 per station. The commissioner must cooperate with biofuel stakeholders in the implementation of the grant program. The commissioner, in cooperation with any economic or community development financial institution and any other entity with which the commissioner contracts, must submit a report on the biofuels infrastructure financial assistance program by January 15 of each year to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over agriculture policy and finance. The annual report must include but not be limited to a summary of the following metrics: (i) the number and types of projects financed; (ii) the amount of dollars leveraged or matched per project; (iii) the geographic distribution of financed projects; (iv) any market expansion associated with upgraded infrastructure; (v) the demographics of the areas served; (vi) the costs of the program; and (vii) the number of grants to minority- or female-owned businesses. The base under this clause is $3,000,000 for fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter; new text end new text begin (4) $1,250,000 the first year and $1,250,000 the second year are for grants to facilitate the start-up, modernization, or expansion of meat, poultry, egg, and milk processing facilities. A grant award under this clause must not exceed $200,000. Any unencumbered balance at the end of the second year does not cancel until June 30, 2028, and may be used for other purposes under this paragraph or paragraph (e). The base under this clause is $250,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter; new text end new text begin (5) up to $1,294,000 the first year and up to $1,294,000 the second year are for providing more fruits, vegetables, meat, poultry, grain, and dairy for children in school and early childhood education settings, including, at the commissioner's discretion, providing grants to reimburse schools and early childhood education and child care providers for purchasing equipment and agricultural products. Organizations must participate in the National School Lunch Program or the Child and Adult Care Food Program to be eligible. Of the amount appropriated, $150,000 each year is for a statewide coordinator of farm-to-institution strategy and programming. The coordinator must consult with relevant stakeholders and provide technical assistance and training for participating farmers and eligible grant recipients; new text end new text begin (6) up to $2,000,000 the first year and up to $2,000,000 the second year are for urban youth agricultural education or urban agriculture community development; new text end new text begin (7) up to $1,000,000 the first year and up to $1,000,000 the second year are for the good food access program under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.1017; and new text end new text begin (8) $200,000 the first year and $200,000 the second year are for cooperative development grants. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, any unencumbered balance does not cancel at the end of the first year and is available for the second year, and appropriations encumbered under contract on or before June 30, 2027, for agricultural growth, research, and innovation grants are available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin (g) The base for the agricultural growth, research, and innovation program is $17,582,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Administration and Financial Assistance new text end new text begin 14,980,000 new text end new text begin 11,121,000 new text end new text begin (a) $474,000 the first year and $474,000 the second year are for payments to county and district agricultural societies and associations under Minnesota Statutes, section 38.02, subdivision 1. Aid payments to county and district agricultural societies and associations must be disbursed no later than July 15 of each year. These payments are the amount of aid from the state for an annual fair held in the previous calendar year. new text end new text begin (b) $500,000 the first year and $500,000 the second year are for grants to the Minnesota Agricultural Education and Leadership Council for programs of the council under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 41D. new text end new text begin (c) $2,000 the first year is for a grant to the Minnesota State Poultry Association. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (d) $36,000 the first year is for a grant to the Minnesota Livestock Breeders Association. new text end new text begin (e) $120,000 the first year is for a grant to the Northern Crops Institute and may be used to purchase equipment. new text end new text begin (f) $68,000 the first year is for a grant to the Minnesota State Horticultural Society. new text end new text begin (g) $50,000 the first year is for a grant to the Center for Rural Policy and Development. new text end new text begin (h) $150,000 the first year is for grants to the Minnesota Turf Seed Council for basic and applied research on: (1) the improved production of forage and turf seed related to new and improved varieties; and (2) native plants, including plant breeding, nutrient management, pest management, disease management, yield, and viability. The Minnesota Turf Seed Council may subcontract with a qualified third party for some or all of the basic or applied research. The Minnesota Turf Seed Council must prepare a report outlining the use of the grant money and related accomplishments. No later than January 15, 2027, the council must submit the report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over agriculture finance and policy. new text end new text begin (i) $400,000 the first year is for grants to GreenSeam for assistance to agriculture-related businesses to support business retention and development, business attraction and creation, talent development and attraction, and regional branding and promotion. No later than December 1, 2026, and December 1, 2027, GreenSeam must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over agriculture and rural development with information on new and existing businesses supported, number of new jobs created in the region, new educational partnerships and programs supported, and regional branding and promotional efforts. new text end new text begin (j) $1,250,000 the first year and $1,250,000 the second year are for grants to Second Harvest Heartland on behalf of Minnesota's six Feeding America food banks for the following purposes: new text end new text begin (1) at least $850,000 each year must be allocated to purchase milk for distribution to Minnesota's food shelves and other charitable organizations that are eligible to receive food from the food banks. Milk purchased with grant proceeds must be acquired from Minnesota milk processors and based on low-cost bids. The milk must be allocated to each Feeding America food bank serving Minnesota according to the formula used in the distribution of United States Department of Agriculture commodities under the Emergency Food Assistance Program. Second Harvest Heartland may enter into contracts or agreements with food banks for shared funding or reimbursement of the direct purchase of milk. Each food bank that receives funding under this clause may use up to two percent for administrative expenses. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, any unencumbered balance the first year does not cancel and is available the second year; new text end new text begin (2) to compensate agricultural producers and processors for costs incurred to harvest and package for transfer surplus fruits, vegetables, and other agricultural commodities that would otherwise go unharvested, be discarded, or be sold in a secondary market. Surplus commodities must be distributed statewide to food shelves and other charitable organizations that are eligible to receive food from the food banks. Surplus food acquired under this clause must be from Minnesota producers and processors. Second Harvest Heartland may use up to 15 percent of each grant awarded under this clause for administrative and transportation expenses; and new text end new text begin (3) to purchase and distribute protein products, including but not limited to pork, poultry, beef, dry legumes, cheese, and eggs to Minnesota's food shelves and other charitable organizations that are eligible to receive food from the food banks. Second Harvest Heartland may use up to two percent of each grant awarded under this clause for administrative expenses. Protein products purchased using grant proceeds must be acquired from Minnesota processors and producers. new text end new text begin Second Harvest Heartland must submit quarterly reports to the commissioner and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over agriculture finance in the form prescribed by the commissioner. The reports must include but are not limited to information on the expenditure of money, the amount of milk or other commodities purchased, and the organizations to which this food was distributed. new text end new text begin (k) $25,000 the first year and $25,000 the second year are for grants to the Southern Minnesota Initiative Foundation to promote local foods through an annual event that raises public awareness of local foods and connects local food producers and processors with potential buyers. new text end new text begin (l) $750,000 the first year and $750,000 the second year are for the Emerging Farmers Office to provide services to beginning and emerging farmers to increase connections between farmers and market opportunities throughout Minnesota. This appropriation may be used for grants, translation services, training programs, or other purposes in line with the recommendations of the emerging farmer working group established under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.055, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (m) $337,000 the first year and $337,000 the second year are for farm advocate services. Of these amounts, $50,000 the first year and $50,000 the second year are for the continuation of the farmland transition programs and may be used for grants to farmland access teams to provide technical assistance to potential beginning farmers. Farmland access teams must assist existing farmers and beginning farmers with transitioning farm ownership and farm operation. Services provided by teams may include but are not limited to mediation assistance, designing contracts, financial planning, tax preparation, estate planning, and housing assistance. new text end new text begin (n) $260,000 the first year and $260,000 the second year are for a pass-through grant to Region Five Development Commission to provide, in collaboration with Farm Business Management, statewide mental health counseling support to Minnesota farm operators, families, and employees, and individuals who work with Minnesota farmers in a professional capacity. Region Five Development Commission may use up to 6.5 percent of the grant awarded under this paragraph for administration. new text end new text begin (o) $150,000 the first year and $150,000 the second year are for administrative support for the Rural Finance Authority. new text end new text begin (p) $137,000 the first year and $204,000 the second year are to maintain the current level of service delivery. new text end new text begin (q) $1,000,000 the first year and $1,000,000 the second year are to award and administer down payment assistance grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.133, with priority given to eligible applicants with no more than $100,000 in annual gross farm product sales and eligible applicants who are producers of industrial hemp, cannabis, or one or more of the following specialty crops as defined by the United States Department of Agriculture for purposes of the specialty crop block grant program: fruits and vegetables, tree nuts, dried fruits, medicinal plants, culinary herbs and spices, horticulture crops, floriculture crops, and nursery crops. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, any unencumbered balance at the end of the first year does not cancel and is available in the second year and appropriations encumbered under contract by June 30, 2027, are available until June 30, 2029. new text end new text begin (r) $3,100,000 the first year is for a grant to First District Association for a wastewater pretreatment project. new text end new text begin (s) The commissioner shall continue to increase connections between ethnic minority and immigrant farmers to farming opportunities and farming programs throughout Minnesota. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin BOARD OF ANIMAL HEALTHnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 6,767,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 6,767,000 new text end new text begin (a) $200,000 the first year and $200,000 the second year are for agricultural emergency preparedness and response. new text end new text begin (b) $357,000 the first year and $357,000 the second year are to maintain the current level of service delivery. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin AGRICULTURAL UTILIZATION RESEARCH INSTITUTEnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 4,388,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 4,434,000 new text end new text begin $45,000 the first year and $91,000 the second year are to maintain the current level of service delivery. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin TRANSFERS.new text end new text begin (a) $100,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 in fiscal year 2027 are transferred from the general fund to the pollinator research account established under Minnesota Statutes, section 18B.051. This transfer is $100,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. new text end new text begin (b) $186,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $186,000 in fiscal year 2027 are transferred from the general fund to the Minnesota grown account and may be used as grants for Minnesota Grown promotion under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.102. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, the appropriations encumbered under contract on or before June 30, 2027, for Minnesota Grown grants in this paragraph are available until June 30, 2029. This transfer is $186,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. new text end new text begin (c) $10,852,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $10,852,000 in fiscal year 2027 are transferred from the general fund to the agriculture research, education, extension, and technology transfer account under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.14, subdivision 3, and the commissioner shall transfer funds each year to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for purposes of Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.14, subdivision 1, clauses (1) and (2), and must supplement and not supplant existing sources and levels of funding. The commissioner may use up to one percent of this transfer for costs incurred to administer this program. new text end new text begin (d) Of the amount transferred for the agriculture research, education, extension, and technology transfer grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.14: new text end new text begin (1) $600,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $600,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for the Minnesota Agricultural Experiment Station's agriculture rapid response fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.14, subdivision 1, clause (2); new text end new text begin (2) up to $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and up to $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for research on avian influenza, salmonella, and other turkey-related diseases and disease prevention measures; new text end new text begin (3) $2,750,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,750,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for grants to the Minnesota Agricultural Educational Leadership Council to enhance agricultural education with priority given to Farm Business Management challenge grants; new text end new text begin (4) $350,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $350,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for potato research; new text end new text begin (5) $802,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $802,000 in fiscal year 2027 are to fund the Forever Green Initiative and protect Minnesota's natural resources while increasing the efficiency, profitability, and productivity of Minnesota farmers by incorporating perennial and winter annual crops into existing agricultural practices. By February 1 each year, the dean of the College of Food, Agricultural, and Natural Resources Sciences must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over agriculture finance and policy and higher education detailing uses of the money in this paragraph, including administrative costs, and the achievements this money contributed to; new text end new text begin (6) $200,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $200,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for research on natural strands of wild rice; and new text end new text begin (7) $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for the cultivated wild rice forward selection project at the North Central Research and Outreach Center, including a tenure track or research associate plant scientist. new text end new text begin The transfer for the agricultural research, education, extension, and technology transfer program is $10,852,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. new text end new text begin (e) $1,425,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,425,000 in fiscal year 2027 are transferred from the general fund to the agricultural and environmental revolving loan account established under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.117, subdivision 5, for low-interest loans under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.117. This transfer is $1,425,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin CANCELLATION.new text end new text begin $3,000,000 of the fiscal year 2024 general fund appropriation for grants to cooperatives to invest in green fertilizer production facilities under Laws 2023, chapter 60, article 10, section 4, is canceled. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin FISCAL YEAR 2025 APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin (a) $125,000 in fiscal year 2025 is appropriated to the commissioner of agriculture for compensation for destroyed or crippled livestock under Minnesota Statutes, section 3.737. The commissioner of agriculture may use up to $5,000 to reimburse expenses incurred by university extension educators to provide fair market values of destroyed or crippled livestock. If the commissioner of agriculture receives federal funding to pay claims for destroyed or crippled livestock, an equivalent amount of this appropriation may be used to reimburse nonlethal prevention methods performed by federal wildlife services staff. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2026. new text end new text begin (b) $125,000 in fiscal year 2025 is appropriated to the commissioner of agriculture for compensation for crop damage under Minnesota Statutes, section 3.7371. The commissioner of agriculture may use up to $10,000 of the appropriation to reimburse expenses incurred by the commissioner of agriculture or the commissioner of agriculture's approved agent to investigate and resolve claims, as well as for costs associated with training for approved agents. The commissioner of agriculture may use up to $40,000 of the appropriation to make grants to producers for measures to protect stored crops from elk damage. If the commissioner of agriculture determines that claims made under Minnesota Statutes, section 3.737 or 3.7371 are unusually high, amounts appropriated for either program may be transferred to the appropriation for the other program. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2026. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin FISCAL YEAR 2025 TRANSFER.new text end new text begin $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2025 is transferred from the general fund to the agricultural emergency account established under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.041. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 17.133, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Grants. The commissioner may award farm down payment assistance grants of up to $15,000 per eligible farmernew text begin purchasing less than 80 acres of farmland, and up to $30,000 per eligible farmer purchasing 80 acres or more of farmlandnew text end . Each award must be matched with at least $8,000 of other funding. Grants under this subdivision may be awarded by a randomized selection process after applications are collected over a period of no less than 30 calendar days. An eligible farmer must commit to own and farm the land purchased with assistance provided under this section for at least five years. For each year that a grant recipient does not own and farm the land during the five-year period, the grant recipient must pay a penalty to the commissioner equal to 20 percent of the grant amount. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18C.005, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4a. new text end new text begin Commercial nitrogen fertilizer. new text end new text begin "Commercial nitrogen fertilizer" means a fertilizer with a nitrogen content that is not less than 25 percent. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin [18C.113] BIOFERTILIZER INNOVATION AND EFFICIENCY PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Program established. new text end new text begin In consultation with the commissioner of natural resources and soil and water conservation districts in Minnesota, the commissioner of agriculture must develop and administer a biofertilizer innovation and efficiency program to address water quality by incentivizing Minnesota farmers to improve nitrogen management and incorporate innovative technologies into the farmers' crop nutrient management plans. The commissioner must determine which products qualify for the program, including soil amendments, fertilizers with nitrogen fixing properties, biological sources of nitrogen, and other biofertilizers. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Payments to qualified farmers. new text end new text begin (a) In consultation with farmers and the fertilizer industry, the commissioner must establish a per-acre payment rate, not less than $5 per acre, for payments provided to a qualifying farmer. The program must provide an annual per-acre incentive payment to a qualifying farmer who verifies through documentation that the farmer has reduced commercial nitrogen fertilizer rates by using a qualifying product in the farmer's crop nutrient management plans by the lesser of: new text end new text begin (1) 15 percent; or new text end new text begin (2) 30 pounds per acre. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must annually review and may adjust the per-acre payment rate based on inflation and emerging fertilizer technology. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Qualifications. new text end new text begin To qualify for the biofertilizer water preservation program, a farmer must: new text end new text begin (1) be a Minnesota resident operating farmland located in Minnesota; new text end new text begin (2) submit documentation to the commissioner, including a crop nutrient management plan that will reduce the use of commercial nitrogen fertilizers at the reduction rate required under subdivision 2 by using a qualifying product determined by the commissioner under subdivision 1; and new text end new text begin (3) enroll a minimum of 40 eligible acres. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Review required. new text end new text begin Every two years, the commissioner must review: new text end new text begin (1) the program's required minimum commercial nitrogen fertilizer reduction rate under subdivision 2 and determine whether an increase in the minimum reduction rate is necessary; and new text end new text begin (2) additional qualifying products that may be used by farmers in the program. When making this determination, the commissioner must consider newly available technologies and products capable of reducing commercial nitrogen fertilizer applications. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Rulemaking required. new text end new text begin The commissioner must adopt rules using rulemaking authority under section 18C.121, subdivision 1, to implement this section. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 41A.16, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Eligibility for participants after April 1, 2023. (a) A facility eligible for payment under this section must source at least 80 percent raw materials from Minnesota. If a facility is sited 50 miles or less from the state border, raw materials may be sourced from within a 100-mile radius. Raw materials must be from agricultural or forestry sources or from solid waste. The facility must be located in Minnesota, must begin production at a specific location after April 1, 2023, and before June 30, 2025, and must not begin operating above 23,750 MMbtu of quarterly new text begin advanced new text end biofuel production before July 1, 2015. Eligible facilities include existing companies and facilities that are adding advanced biofuel production capacity, or retrofitting existing capacity, as well as new companies and facilities. Production of conventional corn ethanol and conventional biodiesel is not eligible. Eligible advanced biofuel facilities must produce at least 23,750 MMbtu of biofuel quarterly. (b) No payments shall be made for advanced biofuel production that occurs after June 30, 2035, for those eligible biofuel producers under paragraph (a). (c) An eligible producer of advanced biofuel shall not transfer the producer's eligibility for payments under this section to an advanced biofuel facility at a different location. (d) A producer that ceases production for any reason is ineligible to receive payments under this section until the producer resumes production. (e) Renewable chemical production for which payment has been received under section 41A.17, and biomass thermal production for which payment has been received under section 41A.18, are not eligible for payment under this section. (f) Biobutanol is eligible under this section. Sec. 13. new text begin COUNTY AGRICULTURAL INSPECTORS.new text end new text begin (a) To be eligible for grants under this section, a county must employ a county agricultural inspector or a county-designated employee who: new text end new text begin (1) has attended training for new county agricultural inspectors offered by the commissioner of agriculture; new text end new text begin (2) coordinates with the commissioner of agriculture to review applicable laws and enforcement procedures; new text end new text begin (3) compiles and submits to the commissioner of agriculture local weed inspector annual report data; new text end new text begin (4) conducts an annual meeting and training for local weed inspectors; and new text end new text begin (5) assists the commissioner of agriculture with control programs and other agricultural programs when requested under Minnesota Statutes, section 18.81, subdivision 1b, as directed by the county board. new text end new text begin (b) County agricultural inspectors and county-designated employees must annually submit an application, on a form approved by the commissioner of agriculture, to be eligible for funding during a given year. The commissioner of agriculture must equally divide available grant money among eligible counties. new text end ARTICLE 2 BROADBAND Section 1. new text begin BROADBAND DEVELOPMENT APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are appropriated to the agencies and for the purposes specified in this article. The appropriations are from the general fund, or another named fund, and are available for the fiscal years indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the appropriations listed under them are available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. "The first year" is fiscal year 2026. "The second year" is fiscal year 2027. "The biennium" is fiscal years 2026 and 2027. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF EMPLOYMENT AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENTnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,001,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,001,000 new text end new text begin $1,001,000 each year is for the Office of Broadband Development. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326B.198, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Installation requirements. (a) The installation of underground telecommunications infrastructure that is located within ten feet of existing underground utilities or that crosses the existing underground utilities must be performed by safety-qualified underground telecommunications installers as follows: (1) the location of existing utilities by hand- or hydro-excavation or other accepted methods must be performed by a safety-qualified underground telecommunications installer;new text begin andnew text end (2) where telecommunications infrastructure is installed by means of directional drilling, the monitoring of the location and depth of the drill head must be performed by a safety-qualified underground telecommunications installerdeleted text begin ; anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (3) no fewer than two safety-qualified underground telecommunications installers must be present at all times at any location where telecommunications infrastructure is being installed by means of directional drilling. deleted text end deleted text begin (b) Beginning July 1, 2025, all installations of underground telecommunications infrastructure subject to this subdivision within the seven-county metropolitan area must be performed by safety-qualified underground telecommunications installers that meet the deleted text end deleted text begin requirements of this subdivision. deleted text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end Beginning January 1, 2026, all installations of underground telecommunications infrastructure subject to this subdivision within this state must be performed by safety-qualified underground telecommunications installers that meet the requirements of this subdivision. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326B.198, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Certification Standards. (a) The commissioner of labor and industry, in consultation with the Office of Broadband, shall approve standards for a safety-qualified underground telecommunications installer certification program that requires a person to: (1) complete a deleted text begin 40-hourdeleted text end new text begin ten-hournew text end initial course that includes classroom and hands-on instruction covering proper work procedures for safe installation of underground utilities, including: (i) regulations applicable to excavation near existing utilities; (ii) identification, location, and verification of utility lines using hand- or hydro-excavation or other accepted methods; (iii) response to line strike incidents; (iv) traffic control procedures; (v) use of a tracking device to safely guide directional drill equipment along a drill path; and (vi) avoidance and mitigation of safety hazards posed by underground utility installation projects; (2) demonstrate knowledge of the course material by successfully completing an examination approved by the commissioner; and (3) complete a four-hour refresher course within three years of completing the original course and every three years thereafter in order to maintain certification. (b) The commissioner must develop an approval process for training providers under this subdivision and may suspend or revoke the approval of any training provider that fails to demonstrate consistent delivery of approved curriculum or success in preparing participants to complete the examination. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end